New York, session 2025-2026, S2009.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The retirement and social security law is amended by adding 2 a new section 11-a to read as follows: 3 § 11-a. Discretionary powers of the comptroller. Notwithstanding any 4 other provision of this chapter to the contrary, the comptroller, as the 5 administrative head of the retirement system, shall have the power and 6 authority to provide a corrective remedy for any member of the retire- 7 ment system or any employee who would otherwise be entitled to member- 8 ship, including the authority to accept applications for membership, 9 changes in membership status, plan designation and other actions which 10 are barred by law, rule or regulation, where the comptroller determines 11 that such action is justified and necessary to correct administrative 12 errors, omissions or inaccuracies or any member, person entitled to 13 membership or participating employer. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00766-01-5